Maryland, session 2025, SB0024.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
16–405.
(b) (1) In this subsection, “protected building” means:
(iii) a [church or other] place of worship.
26–904.
(d) (2) A license holder that obtains an entertainment permit under § 26–1103
of this title may allow an individual under 21 years of age to be present on the premises
while an alcoholic beverage is being served during any of the following events:
(ix) [church] event HELD BY A FAITH INSTITUTION;
Article – Business Regulation
5–602.
(a) This subtitle does not apply to a cemetery that:
(2) is owned and operated by:
(i) a county;
(ii) a municipal corporation;

SENATE BILL 24 5
(iii) [a church;
(iv) a synagogue;] A FAITH INSTITUTION;
[(v)] (IV) a religious organization;
[(vi)] (V) a nonprofit organization created before 1900 by an act of
the General Assembly;
[(vii)] (VI) a family and does not conduct public sales; or
[(viii)] (VII) a State veterans agency.
17–1803.
(e) (1) An exhibitor need not get a trader’s license for a show if the show is
promoted by:
(i) a [church] FAITH INSTITUTION, as defined in § 5–301(b) of the
Corporations and Associations Article;
Article – Commercial Law
13–104.
This title does not apply to:
(1) The professional services of a certified public accountant, architect,
[clergyman] MEMBER OF THE CLERGY, professional engineer, lawyer, veterinarian,
insurance company authorized to do business in the State, insurance producer licensed by
the State, Christian Science practitioner, land surveyor, property line surveyor,
chiropractor, optometrist, physical therapist, podiatrist, real estate broker, associate real
estate broker, or real estate salesperson, or medical or dental practitioner;
14–401.
(l) (3) “Services” does not include the professional services of an accountant,
architect, [clergyman] MEMBER OF THE CLERGY, engineer, lawyer, or medical or dental
practitioner.
23–101.
(e) (2) “Retirement community” does not include:

SENATE BILL 24
(vi) A retirement community that is owned by or affiliated with a
[church] FAITH INSTITUTION or religious organization;
Article – Corporations and Associations
5–301.
(b) [“Church”] “FAITH INSTITUTION” means any [church] FAITH
INSTITUTION, CHRISTIAN, JEWISH, ISLAMIC, BUDDHIST, OR HINDU
CONGREGATION, OR ANY OTHER religious society, or, congregation of any sect, order, or
denomination.
5–301.1.
Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle or in any other provision of law, this
part applies to every religious corporation formed in this State by any [church] FAITH
INSTITUTION.
5–302.
(a) The adult members of a [church] FAITH INSTITUTION may form a religious
corporation as provided in this part.
(b) The members shall:
(1) Elect at least four individuals to act as trustees in the name of and on
behalf of the [church] FAITH INSTITUTION; and
(2) Prepare a plan of the [church] FAITH INSTITUTION.
(c) The plan shall include:
(1) The purposes for which the religious corporation is formed;
(2) The name of the religious corporation and the [church] FAITH
INSTITUTION;
(3) The time and manner for election and succession of trustees; and
(4) The exact qualifications of individuals eligible:
(i) To vote at elections; and
(ii) To be elected to office.
5–304.

SENATE BILL 24 7
(b) The articles of incorporation shall contain:
(1) The plan of the [church] FAITH INSTITUTION;
(2) The address of the principal place of worship of the [church] FAITH
INSTITUTION; and
(3) The name and address of the resident agent of the [church] FAITH
INSTITUTION.
5–305.
If a [church] FAITH INSTITUTION forms a religious corporation, any assets held in
trust for the [church] FAITH INSTITUTION by any person shall be conveyed immediately
to the religious corporation.
5–307.
(b) Unless the plan provides otherwise, the trustees shall be elected and their
successors continued at the time and place ordinarily used for public meetings of the
[church] FAITH INSTITUTION, by the individuals who, according to the custom and usage
of the [church] FAITH INSTITUTION, have a voice in the management and direction of
congregational or temporal affairs.
(c) Unless the plan permits otherwise, the minister of the [church] FAITH
INSTITUTION or, if there is more than one minister, the senior minister shall be a trustee
of the religious corporation, in addition to the trustees required by § 5–302(b)(1) of this
subtitle.
5–310.
(a) If any contest arises over the voting rights or the fair conduct of an election:
(1) Each contending party shall appoint one individual from among the
members of a neighboring [church] FAITH INSTITUTION of the same religious persuasion
or, if there is no such [church] FAITH INSTITUTION, from among the members of any other
[church] FAITH INSTITUTION; and
5–311.
(a) Members of a [church] FAITH INSTITUTION may separate from the [church]
FAITH INSTITUTION, form a house of worship, and employ a minister if:
(1) They are of sufficient number to form a house of worship and maintain
a minister; and

SENATE BILL 24
(2) All debts and contracts incurred by them as members of the original
[church] FAITH INSTITUTION are discharged.
(b) When incorporated, the new [church] FAITH INSTITUTION is entitled to the
benefits of this subtitle relating to religious corporations.
5–312.
(a) If any [church] FAITH INSTITUTION organized since 1800 as a religious
corporation under any law of the State did not file its plan or articles of incorporation for
record in the proper office within the time required by law, but subsequently files its plan
or articles of incorporation in the proper office:
(1) The [church] FAITH INSTITUTION is a lawful religious corporation;
(2) The date of incorporation is the date of the plan or articles of
incorporation; and
(3) If otherwise lawful, every action of the [church] FAITH INSTITUTION
from the date of incorporation is valid.
(b) There is a conclusive presumption in every court of the State that a plan or
articles of incorporation of a religious corporation were properly filed for record in the
appropriate office and that these records were lost or destroyed, if:
(1) It appears from the record book of the religious corporation or from any
other source that the [church] FAITH INSTITUTION adopted a valid plan or articles of
incorporation; and
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
3–2A–01.
(f) (2) “Health care provider” does not include any nursing institution
conducted by and for those who rely upon treatment by spiritual means through prayer
alone in accordance with the tenets and practices of a recognized [church or religious
denomination] FAITH INSTITUTION.
9–111.
A minister of the gospel, [clergyman] MEMBER OF THE CLERGY, or priest of an
established [church of any denomination] FAITH INSTITUTION may not be compelled to
testify on any matter in relation to any confession or communication made to him in
confidence by a person seeking his spiritual advice or consolation.

SENATE BILL 24 9
Article – Criminal Law
4–209.
(b) (1) A county, municipal corporation, or special taxing district may regulate
the purchase, sale, transfer, ownership, possession, and transportation of the items listed
in subsection (a) of this section:
(iii) except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, within 100
yards of or in a park, [church] PLACE OF WORSHIP, school, public building, and other place
of public assembly.
Article – Economic Development
10–301.
(k) “Noncollegiate educational institution” means a noncollegiate educational
institution as defined in § 2–206 of the Education Article that:
(1) has received a certificate of approval from the State Board of Education;
or
(2) is an institution operated by a bona fide [church organization] FAITH
INSTITUTION.
Article – Education
2–206.
(e) (4) This subsection does not apply to [an] A NONCOLLEGIATE
EDUCATIONAL institution operated by a bona fide [church organization] FAITH
INSTITUTION, including the Amish and Mennonite church parochial schools. However,
[an] A NONCOLLEGIATE EDUCATIONAL institution that does not have a certificate of
approval from the State Board may not receive State funds, except that [an] A
NONCOLLEGIATE EDUCATIONAL institution operated by a bona fide [church
organization] FAITH INSTITUTION is not required to have a certificate to receive State
funds for eligible students in the food service program who are enrolled in nursery school
through the eighth grade.
2–304.
(b) (1) Before a private noncollegiate educational institution that operates in
this State ends operations, including those operated by bona fide [church organizations]
FAITH INSTITUTIONS, the chief administrative officer of the PRIVATE NONCOLLEGIATE
EDUCATIONAL institution shall file with the State Superintendent the original or a legible
copy of all essential records of the academic achievements of each former student of the

SENATE BILL 24
PRIVATE NONCOLLEGIATE EDUCATIONAL institution who received instruction in any
combination of grades 9 through 12 or their equivalents.
7–108.
(b) (1) If written application is made to the county superintendent, the county
board shall provide for the use of a public school facility for:
(iv) Other civic, educational, social, or recreational purposes or
[church] FAITH INSTITUTION affiliated civic purposes.
7–404.
(g) A student whose parent or guardian objects in writing to hearing and vision
screening on the ground that it conflicts with the tenets and practice of a recognized [church
or religious denomination] FAITH INSTITUTION of which he is an adherent or member may
not be required to take these screenings.
11–202.1.
(h) With regard to a religious educational institution authorized to operate
without a certificate of approval under subsection (b) of this section, a person may not:
(2) Enroll a student in the institution unless, before enrollment, the person
gives written notice to and obtains a written acknowledgment from the student that:
(i) The institution’s instructional program is only designed for and
aimed at persons who hold or seek to learn the particular religious faith or beliefs of the
[church] FAITH INSTITUTION or religious institution, and provides only educational
programs for religious vocations or purposes;
Article – Environment
6–401.
(g) (2) “Public and commercial building” includes:
(ix) [Churches] PLACES OF WORSHIP;
14–108.
The Department shall deny the permit if the Department determines that:
(4) The operation will constitute a significant physical hazard to a
neighboring dwelling unit, school, [church] PLACE OF WORSHIP, hospital, commercial or

SENATE BILL 24 11
industrial building, public road, or other public or private property in existence at the time
of the application for the permit;
15–505.
(b) (2) Subject to valid existing rights, as that term is used in the federal
Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977, the Department may not issue,
extend or renew any permit:
(v) Within 300 feet of any public building, school, public park,
[church] PLACE OF WORSHIP, community or institutional building; or
15–810.
(b) The Department may deny the permit on finding that:
(4) The operation will constitute a substantial physical hazard to a
neighboring dwelling house, school, [church] PLACE OF WORSHIP, hospital, commercial
or industrial building, public road, or other public or private property in existence at the
time of application for the permit;
Article – Family Law
2–403.
(a) (1) A license shall read substantially as follows:
“State of Maryland and County of ........... To any individual authorized by the laws
of this State to perform a marriage ceremony. You are hereby authorized to join together
in matrimony according to the rules and ceremonies of your [church] FAITH INSTITUTION,
society or religious sect and the laws of this State, or according to the laws of this State,
the following individuals:
………………………………………………
(state here name of intended party one)
………………………………………………
(state here name of intended party two)
Given under my hand and seal of the Circuit Court for ………, this ……… day of
….………… (state here month and year).”
5–705.
(a) (3) A minister of the gospel, [clergyman] MEMBER OF THE CLERGY, or
priest of an established [church of any denomination] FAITH INSTITUTION is not required
to provide notice under paragraph (1) of this subsection if the notice would disclose matter
in relation to any communication described in § 9–111 of the Courts Article and:

SENATE BILL 24
(i) the communication was made to the minister, [clergyman]
MEMBER OF THE CLERGY, or priest in a professional character in the course of discipline
enjoined by the [church] FAITH INSTITUTION to which the minister, [clergyman]
MEMBER OF THE CLERGY, or priest belongs; and
(ii) the minister, [clergyman] MEMBER OF THE CLERGY, or priest
is bound to maintain the confidentiality of that communication under canon law, [church]
THE doctrine OF THE FAITH INSTITUTION, or practice.
Article – General Provisions
1–108.1.
“FAITH INSTITUTION” MEANS ANY CHRISTIAN, JEWISH, ISLAMIC, BUDDHIST,
OR HINDU CONGREGATION, OR ANY OTHER RELIGIOUS SOCIETY OR,
CONGREGATION OF ANY SECT, ORDER, OR DENOMINATION.
Article – Health – General
7–1003.
(i) (1) An individual shall be entitled to receive visits:
(i) From a lawyer that the individual chooses;
(ii) From a [clergyman] MEMBER OF THE CLERGY that the
individual chooses; and
(iii) During reasonable visiting hours that the licensee sets, from any
other visitor.
(2) Each married individual in a licensed residential facility shall have
privacy during a visit by the spouse.
(3) If, for the welfare of the individual, visits are restricted, the restriction
shall be:
(i) Signed by the executive officer or administrative head of the
licensee; and
(ii) Made a permanent part of the individual’s record.
(4) Visits of an individual’s lawyer or [clergyman] MEMBER OF THE
CLERGY may not be restricted.
10–703.

SENATE BILL 24 13
(a) Each individual in a facility shall be entitled to converse privately with and
receive visits:
(1) At all reasonable hours, from a lawyer that the individual chooses;
(2) At all reasonable hours, from a [clergyman] MEMBER OF THE CLERGY
that the individual chooses; and
(3) During reasonable visiting hours that the facility sets, from any other
visitor if the individual wishes to see the visitor.
(b) If an individual refuses to see a visitor, the refusal shall be made a permanent
part of the individual’s record.
(c) (1) If, for medically justified reasons, visits or private conversations are
restricted, the restriction and the reasons for the restriction shall be:
(i) Signed by a physician;
(ii) Dated as to when the restriction expires;
(iii) Made a permanent part of the individual’s record; and
(iv) Reviewed every 30 days if the restriction remains in effect.
(2) Visits of an individual’s lawyer or [clergyman] MEMBER OF THE
CLERGY may not be restricted during reasonable hours.
19–301.
(o) (2) “Related institution” does not include a nursing facility or visiting nurse
service that is conducted only by or for adherents of a bona fide [church] FAITH
INSTITUTION or religious organization, in accordance with tenets and practices that
include reliance on treatment by spiritual means alone for healing.
19–403.
This subtitle does not:
(3) Prohibit the care of an individual who relies on treatment in accordance
with the tenets and practices of a recognized [church or religious denomination] FAITH
INSTITUTION and, with or without compensation, is cared for in accordance with those
tenets and practices.
19–4A–02.

SENATE BILL 24
This subtitle does not:
(2) Prohibit the care of an individual who relies on treatment in accordance
with the tenets and practices of a recognized [church or religious denomination] FAITH
INSTITUTION and, with or without compensation, is provided care in accordance with those
tenets and practices.
Article – Health Occupations
1–401.
(a) (4) (ii) “Provider of health care” does not include any nursing institution
that is conducted by and for those who rely on treatment by spiritual means through prayer
alone in accordance with the tenets and practices of a recognized [church or religious
denomination] FAITH INSTITUTION.
9–307.
(a) In this section, “certified institution” means an institution that:
(1) Cares for and treats the sick in accordance with the teachings of any
recognized [church or religious denomination] FAITH INSTITUTION that teaches reliance
on spiritual means through prayer alone for healing; and
(2) Is certified by that [church or religious denomination] FAITH
INSTITUTION to provide this care and treatment.
(c) An applicant qualifies for a limited license only if a recognized [church or
religious denomination] FAITH INSTITUTION that teaches reliance on spiritual means
through prayer alone for healing approves the applicant as qualified to administer certified
institutions.
Article – Labor and Employment
8–208.
(b) Employment is not covered employment if the employment is performed for:
(1) a [church or an association or convention of churches] FAITH
INSTITUTION OR AN ASSOCIATION OR CONVENTION OF FAITH INSTITUTIONS; or
(2) an organization that is:
(i) operated primarily for religious purposes; and

SENATE BILL 24 15
(ii) controlled, operated, principally supported, or supervised by a
[church or an association or convention of churches] FAITH INSTITUTION OR AN
ASSOCIATION OR CONVENTION OF FAITH INSTITUTIONS.
(c) Employment is not covered employment if the employment is performed by:
(1) a commissioned, licensed, or ordained minister of a [church] FAITH
INSTITUTION in the exercise of the ministry; or
(2) a member of a religious order in the exercise of duties required by the
order.
Article – Natural Resources
10–410.
(g) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, a
person, other than the owner or occupant, while hunting for any wild bird or mammal may
not shoot or discharge any firearm or other deadly weapon within 150 yards, known as the
“safety zone”, of a dwelling house, residence, [church] PLACE OF WORSHIP, or other
building or camp occupied by human beings, or shoot at any wild bird or mammal while it
is within this area, without the specific advance permission of the owner or occupant.
(3) (i) For archery hunters in Allegany County, Calvert County, Carroll
County, Cecil County, Frederick County, Garrett County, Harford County, Montgomery
County, St. Mary’s County, Washington County, Worcester County, or Wicomico County,
the safety zone described in paragraph (1) of this subsection extends for 50 yards from a
dwelling house, residence, [church] PLACE OF WORSHIP, or any other building or camp
occupied by human beings.
(ii) For archery hunters in Anne Arundel County, the safety zone
described in paragraph (1) of this subsection extends for 100 yards from a dwelling house,
residence, [church] PLACE OF WORSHIP, or any other building or camp occupied by human
beings.
(iii) In Howard County, for archery hunters who are hunting under
the authority of a deer management permit, or who are actively participating in a hunting
program administered by the county, the safety zone described in paragraph (1) of this
subsection extends for 50 yards from a dwelling house, residence, [church] PLACE OF
WORSHIP, or any other building or camp occupied by humans.
(5) In Harford County, an archery hunter shall use a tree stand when
hunting any wild bird or mammal within 50 to 100 yards of a dwelling house, residence,
[church] PLACE OF WORSHIP, public or nonpublic school, or other building or camp
occupied by human beings.

SENATE BILL 24
(6) (i) In Montgomery County or Washington County, an archery
hunter shall be in an elevated position that allows the hunter to shoot in a downward
trajectory when hunting any wild bird or mammal within 50 to 100 yards of a dwelling
house, residence, [church] PLACE OF WORSHIP, public or nonpublic school, or other
building or camp occupied by human beings.
(ii) In Howard County, for archery hunters who are hunting under
the authority of a deer management permit, or who are actively participating in a hunting
program administered by the county, shall be in an elevated position that allows the
hunters to shoot in a downward trajectory when hunting any wild bird or mammal within
50 to 150 yards of a dwelling house, residence, [church] PLACE OF WORSHIP, public or
nonpublic school, or other building or camp occupied by human beings.
Article – Public Safety
6–307.
(a) (1) The State Fire Marshal shall inspect for fire exits and reasonable safety
standards:
(ii) all schools, theaters, [churches] PLACES OF WORSHIP, and
other places of public assembly.
10–204.
(a) (1) Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, a mixing building
or storage building of a fireworks plant shall be located at least:
(i) 1,000 feet from a school, [church] PLACE OF WORSHIP, hospital,
place of public assembly, or gasoline or fuel oil storage building or service station; and
14–1001.
(a) In this section, “structure” means:
(1) a [church, chapel,] PLACE OF WORSHIP or convent;
Article – Real Property
12–104.
(d) The damages to be awarded for the taking of a structure, such as a [church or
place of religious worship] PLACE OF WORSHIP, held in fee simple, or under a lease
renewable forever, by or for the benefit of a religious body and regularly used by the
religious body, are the cost of reproducing or replacing the improvements, adjusted for

SENATE BILL 24 17
physical and functional depreciation, to which shall be added the fair market value of the
land.
Article – State Government
9–1010.
(a) The Archives:
(1) shall collect public and private records and other information that
relate to the history of the province and State of Maryland from the earliest times, including
[church] records OF FAITH INSTITUTIONS and newspapers;
Article – Tax – General
11–204.
(b) The sales and use tax does not apply to a sale by:
(1) a bona fide [church] FAITH INSTITUTION or religious organization, if
the sale is made for the general purposes of the [church] FAITH INSTITUTION or
organization;
(7) subject to subsection (e) of this section, a bona fide [church] FAITH
INSTITUTION, religious organization, or other nonprofit organization exempt from taxation
under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code if:
(i) the sale is made at an auction sale; and
(ii) the proceeds of the sale are used to carry on the exempt purposes
of the [church] FAITH INSTITUTION or organization; or
11–206.
(d) The sales and use tax does not apply to:
(1) a sale of food:
(ii) by a [church] FAITH INSTITUTION or religious organization;
Article – Transportation
8–714.
(b) A permit is not required under this section to erect or maintain any outdoor
sign:

SENATE BILL 24
(3) That is used only to advertise:
(ii) A county [or church] fair held in this State OR A FAIR HELD IN
THIS STATE BY A FAITH INSTITUTION;
8–742.
This part does not prohibit the erection or maintenance of:
(1) Any on premise outdoor sign that complies with § 8–744 of this subtitle;
(2) Any outdoor sign used to identify a [church] PLACE OF WORSHIP or a
historical monument or location, if the sign is erected in accordance with the rules and
regulations of the Administration; or
(3) Any outdoor sign along a highway that is not an expressway, even if the
highway runs parallel or partially parallel to an expressway, if the sign faces that highway.
11–117.
(a) “Educational purposes” includes those activities of schools certified by the
Department of Education, activities of centers for individuals with an intellectual disability
and physically handicapped individuals, [church schools] SCHOOLS OPERATED BY A
FAITH INSTITUTION, Sunday schools and [church] FAITH INSTITUTION related
functions, child care centers, day camps, or summer camps, or any other activity that
provides some educational experience for its participants.
21–703.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, this section applies to:
(3) Every bus that is owned or operated by a [church] FAITH INSTITUTION
and carrying any passenger;
(g) (2) This section does not apply to school buses and [church] buses THAT
ARE OWNED OR OPERATED BY A FAITH INSTITUTION, as described in subsection (a)(2)
and (3) of this section, at locations within Baltimore City where complying with the
provision of this section would conflict with the existing traffic signal indications.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.